Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.110

Use of words "coin silver," etc.

Every person who shall make, sell or offer to sell or dispose of, or have in his or her possession with intent to dispose of any metal article marked, stamped or branded with the words "coin," or "coin silver," unless nine hundred one-thousandths of the component parts of the metal of which such article and all parts thereof is manufactured, is pure silver, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 291; 1909 c 249 s 429; RRS s 2681.]